Texas, session 892, HB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 483, Government Code, as added by H.B. 14, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 2.  The comptroller shall transfer any money appropriated to the Texas Advanced Nuclear Energy Office to the Texas Education Agency for the state fiscal biennium beginning September 1, 2025, to reduce the state compression percentage under Section 48.255, Education Code, to the lowest possible percentage. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.